Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2102
Further action; authorized.

A judgment in favor of a party for one delinquency does not preclude the same or another party from an action on the same security for another delinquency.

R.S.1867, Code § 644, p. 507;

R.S.1913, § 8217;

C.S.1922, § 9170;

C.S.1929, § 20-2102;

R.S.1943, § 25-2102.